New York, session 2025-2026, S4446.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "shelter arrears eviction forestallment act". 3 § 2. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 131-cc 4 to read as follows: 5 § 131-cc. Shelter arrears eviction forestallment program. 1. (a) With- 6 in amounts appropriated therefor, the office of temporary and disability 7 assistance shall establish the shelter arrears eviction forestallment 8 program to provide emergency assistance for rent arrears for the 9 prevention of eviction due to nonpayment of rent or mortgage arrears, 10 homeowners' association fees, legal fees, or late fees if an applicant 11 can establish that such expenses are necessary to retain their housing. 12 Funds shall be allocated to social services districts with a population 13 of five million or fewer, for services and expenses related to the 14 payment of rent arrears necessary to retain housing and to households 15 that are in receipt of or who would be eligible for ongoing or emergency 16 public assistance pursuant to section one hundred thirty-one-a of this 17 title but have exhausted the allowable frequency of such payments 18 through the emergency safety net assistance or emergency assistance to 19 families programs. Each social services district to which funds are 20 allocated pursuant to this section shall use best efforts to make such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08817-03-5 S. 4446--A 2 1 funds available to households for the purposes set forth in this 2 section. 3 (b) The office of temporary and disability assistance shall allocate 4 funding to social services districts with a population of five million 5 or fewer, with a methodology that shall consider the rate of eviction 6 filings and other indicators of need as determined by the office of 7 temporary and disability assistance. 8 (c) The office shall establish rules for the administration of the 9 program, including but not limited to: 10 (i) requiring payments shall not exceed a total of six months of 11 arrears in addition to payments previously made through the emergency 12 safety net assistance or emergency assistance to families programs; 13 (ii) providing that such payments shall not be limited by the shelter 14 allowance amount set forth in section one hundred thirty-one-a of this 15 title and shall not be part of the standard of need pursuant to such 16 section; 17 (iii) providing that funding allocated to social services districts 18 pursuant to this section shall not replace or reduce any other emergency 19 assistance allocations such districts would otherwise receive; 20 (iv) requiring program payments be made directly to the landlord or 21 property owner on behalf of a tenant. Tenants, landlords and property 22 managers shall be notified of any assistance provided under the program; 23 (v) providing that program payments may be issued to households who 24 are unable to reasonably demonstrate an ability to pay future shelter 25 expenses; 26 (vi) providing that districts may establish local criteria regarding 27 the use of their allocations and will maintain responsibility for not 28 exceeding their allocation issued pursuant to this section; and 29 (vii) providing that districts may elect to delegate the adminis- 30 tration of the program established pursuant to this section, in full or 31 in part, to another public agency, contractor or non-profit organiza- 32 tion. 33 2. In a form and manner prescribed by the office of temporary and 34 disability assistance, social services districts with a population of 35 five million or fewer shall submit annual reports to the office includ- 36 ing but not limited to the following information: 37 (a) the criteria used by such social services district to determine 38 program eligibility; 39 (b) the dollar value of arrears issued under the program; and 40 (c) basic demographic information on the households served including 41 but not limited to the: 42 (i) number of households served; 43 (ii) number of households served for multiple periods; 44 (iii) number and percentage of households with and without children; 45 (iv) number and percentage of households with an open public assist- 46 ance (PA) case; 47 (v) age distribution of the primary tenant; 48 (vi) distribution of the number of children; 49 (vii) distribution of total payment amount; and 50 (viii) distribution of race and ethnicity. 51 3. The office of temporary and disability assistance shall submit a 52 report to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the 53 speaker of the assembly by the thirty-first of December of each year. 54 Such report shall cover the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth 55 of September immediately preceding the date the report is due and shall 56 include but not be limited to the information submitted pursuant to S. 4446--A 3 1 subdivision two of this section, in the aggregate for the state and for 2 each county. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.